Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 50-73.79.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Business”
includes every trade, occupation, and profession.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Debtor in bankruptcy”
means a person who is the subject of:

an order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

a comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

“Distribution”
means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner or to the partner’s transferee.

“Foreign registered limited liability partnership”
means a limited liability partnership or registered limited liability partnership, or the functional equivalent thereof, formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth and registered as a limited liability partnership under the laws of that state or jurisdiction.

“Partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under §

50-73.88

, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of this Commonwealth, a registered limited liability partnership.

“Partnership agreement”
means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership, including amendments to the partnership agreement.

“Partnership at will”
means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking.

“Partnership interest”
or

“partner’s interest in the partnership”

means all of a partner’s interests in the partnership, including the partner’s transferable interest and all management and other rights.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal office”
means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, where the chief executive offices of a domestic or foreign partnership or registered limited liability partnership are located.

“Property”
means all property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein.

“Registered limited liability partnership”
means a partnership formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of this Commonwealth and registered under §

50-73.132

.

“State”
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Statement”
means a statement of partnership authority under §

50-73.93

, a statement of denial under §

50-73.94

, a statement of dissociation under §

50-73.115

, a statement of dissolution under §

50-73.121

, a statement of merger under §

50-73.131

, a statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership under §

50-73.132

, a statement of registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership under §

50-73.138

, an amendment or cancellation of any of the foregoing or a renewal of a statement of partnership authority.

“Transfer”
includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2003, c. 567; 2006, c. 912; 2007, c. 631.

Uniform law cross references.

For other Uniform Partnership Act (1992/1994/1997) signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. § 10A-8A-1.01 et seq.

Alaska: Alaska Stat. §§ 32.06.201 to 32.06.997.

Arizona: A.R.S. §§ 29-1001 to 29-1111.

Arkansas: A.C.A. §§ 4-46-101 to 4-46-1207.

California: Cal. Corp. Code §§ 16100 to 16962.

Colorado: C.R.S. §§ 7-64-101 to 7-64-1206.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. § 34-300 et seq.

Delaware: 6 Del. C. §§ 15-101 to 15-1210.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code § 29-601.01 et seq.

Florida: Fla. Stat. §§ 620.81001 to 620.9902.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. Section 14-8-1 et seq.

Hawaii: H.R.S. § 425-101 et seq.

Idaho: Idaho Code § 30-23-101 et seq.

Illinois: 805 I.L.C.S. 206/100 to 206/1299.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. § 23-4-1-1 et seq.

Iowa: Iowa Code §§ 486A.101 to 486A.1302.

Kansas: K.S.A. §§ 56a-101 to 56a-1305.

Kentucky: K.R.S. § 362.1-101 et seq.

Maine: 31 M.R.S.
§ 1001 et seq.

Maryland: Md. Corporations and Associations Code Ann. § 9A-101 et seq.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. § 323A.0101 et seq.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. §§ 79-13-101 to 79-13-1206.

Missouri: § 358.010 R.S.Mo. et seq.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno. § 35-10-701 et seq.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. §§ 67-401 to 67-467.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 87.010 et seq.

New Hampshire: RSA 304-A:1 et seq.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat. §§ 42:1A-1 to 42:1A-56.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. §§

54-1

A-101 to

54-1

A-1206.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. § 59-31 et seq.

Ohio: O.R.C. Ann. § 1776.01 et seq.

Oklahoma: 54 Okl. St. §§ 1-100 to 1-1207.

Oregon: O.R.S. §§ 68.010 to 68.640.

Pennsylvania: 15 Pa.C.S. § 8411 et seq.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws Section 7-12-12 et seq.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. § 33-41-10 et seq.

South Dakota S.D. Codified Laws §§

48-7

A-101 to

48-7

A-1208.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 61-1-101 to 61-1-1208.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. §

48-1

d-101 et seq.

Vermont: 11 V.S.A. §§ 3201 to 3313.

Virgin Islands: 26 V.I.C. §§ 1 to 274.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. §§ 25.05.005 to 25.05.907.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code §§ 47B-1-1 to 47B-11-5.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 178.0101 et seq.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. §§ 17-21-101 to 17-21-1105.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 567 in the definition of “Statement,” substituted “registration” for “qualification” preceding “as a foreign,” deleted “or” following “§

50-73.138

,” and inserted “or a renewal of a statement of partnership authority.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912 substituted “chapter” for “article” in the introductory paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 inserted the definition for “Principal office.”

Law Review.

For a symposium on “Withdrawals and Expulsions From Law Firms: The Rights and Duties of Partners and Their Firms,” see 55 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 997 (1998).

For symposium, “The Boundaries of Copyright and Trademark/Consumer Protection Law: Trademarks and the Boundary of the Firm,” see 51 Wm. and Mary L. Rev. 345 (2009).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 4 Garnishment. § 4.8 Other Property Subject to Garnishment. Doug Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1201 Complaint for Settlement of Partnership Accounts; No. 12-102 General Partnership Agreement, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Cotenancy, § 14; 14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 18, 21, 29.

§ 50-73.80.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of it;

Has received a notification of it; or

Has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another by taking steps reasonably calculated to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification when the notification:

Comes to the person’s attention; or

Is duly delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection F, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

A partner’s knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.81.
Effect of partnership agreement; nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership are governed by the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The partnership agreement may not:

Vary the rights and duties in §

50-73.83

except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all of the partners;

Unreasonably restrict the right of access to books and records in subsection B of §

50-73.101

;

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing in subsection D of §

50-73.102

, but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the power to dissociate as a partner in subsection A of §

50-73.110

, except to require the notice in subdivision 1 of §

50-73.109

to be in writing;

Vary the right of a court to expel a partner in the events specified in subdivision 5 of §

50-73.109

;

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases specified in subdivisions 4, 5 or 6 of §

50-73.117

;

Restrict rights of third parties under this chapter without the consent of those third parties; or

Vary the law applicable to registered limited liability partnerships as set forth in subsection B of §

50-73.84

.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.82.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in §

6.2-302

.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-302

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-330.54,” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

§ 50-73.83.
Execution, filing, and recording of statements; effective time and date; refunds; penalty.

A statement may be filed with the Commission. A duly authenticated copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be filed with the Commission. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in the Commonwealth.

A duly authenticated copy of a statement that has been filed with the Commission and recorded in the office for recording transfers of real property has the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter. A recorded statement that is not a duly authenticated copy of a statement filed with the Commission does not have the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter.

A statement filed by a partnership shall be executed by at least two partners. Other statements shall be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. The person executing a statement shall sign it and state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he executes the document. Any person may execute a statement by an attorney-in-fact. It shall be unlawful for any person to sign a document he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Commission for filing, and any person who violates this provision shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may:

Amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that states the name of the partnership as it is set forth on the records of the Commission, states the identification number issued by the Commission to the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation; and

Renew a statement of partnership authority by filing during the 90-day period preceding the date of the statement’s cancellation by operation of law, a renewal of a statement of partnership authority that names the partnership, states the identification number issued by the Commission to the partnership, states the partnership’s desire to renew the statement of partnership authority, and states that all of the information set forth in the statement of partnership authority is true and correct as of the execution date of the renewal.

A person who files a statement pursuant to this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

The fees paid into the state treasury under this section shall be set aside and paid into the special fund created under §

13.1-775.1

, subject to that section. The Commission shall have the authority to certify to the Comptroller directing refund of any overpayment of a fee or of any fee collected for a document that is not accepted for filing, at any time within one year from the date of its payment. The Commission shall charge and collect the following fees:

The fee shall be $100 for filing any one of the following:

A statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership; or

A statement of registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

A statement of partnership authority or any other statement or an amendment thereto or cancellation thereof, or a renewal of a statement of partnership authority.

A statement that the statement is being canceled in accordance with this section.

The Commission may provide forms for statements and reports.

Any statement filed with the Commission under this chapter shall be typewritten or printed. The typewritten or printed portion shall be in black. Photocopies, or other reproduced copies, of typewritten or printed statements may be filed. In every case, information in the statement shall be legible and the document shall be capable of being reformatted and reproduced in copies of archival quality. The statement shall be in the English language. A partnership name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals. Any signature on a statement may be a facsimile.

The Commission may accept the electronic filing of any information required or permitted to be filed under this chapter and may prescribe the methods of execution, recording, reproduction and certification of electronically filed information pursuant to § 59.1-496.

A statement shall be effective at the time of the filing of the statement with the Commission unless the statement is filed on behalf of a partnership formed under §

50-73.88

or predecessor law and states that it shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the statement. In that event, the statement shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the statement is filed with the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified.
J. 1. A statement shall be effective at the time of the filing of the statement with the Commission unless the statement is filed on behalf of a partnership formed under §

50-73.88

or predecessor law and states that it shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the statement. In that event, the statement shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the statement is filed with the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified.

Notwithstanding the terms of subdivision 1, any statement that has a delayed effective time or date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a notice of cancellation signed by each party to the statement is delivered to the Commission for filing. If the Commission finds that the notice of cancellation complies with the requirements of the law, it shall file the notice and the statement shall be deemed canceled and shall not become effective.

A notice of cancellation shall contain:

2.

The fee shall be $50 for filing an annual continuation report pursuant to §

50-73.134

.

3.

The fee shall be $25 for filing any one of the following:

a.

An amendment to a statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership;

b.

An amendment to a statement of registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership; or

4.

For issuing a certificate pursuant to §

50-73.150

, the fee shall be $6.The court responsible for recording transfers of real property may collect a fee for recording a statement.

a.

The name of the partnership;

b.

The name of the statement and the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission;

c.

The time and date on which the statement becomes effective; and

4.

For statements with a delayed effective date and time, the effective date and times shall be Eastern Time.

History.

1996, c. 292; 1997, c. 188; 2000, cc. 5, 995; 2002, c. 441; 2003, c. 567; 2004, cc. 316, 601; 2007, cc. 631, 771; 2009, c. 716; 2010, c. 675; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 5, effective February 18, 2000, deleted “A reinstatement fee” from the beginning of subdivision F 1 c; and added “and reports” at the end of subsection G.

The 2000 amendment by c. 995 added “pursuant to § 59.1-518” at the end of subsection I.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 inserted the second sentence of subsection C; substituted “subdivision E 1” for “subdivision F 1” in subdivision F 1 c; and inserted “continuation” in subdivision F 2 c.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 567 rewrote subsection D, which formerly read: “A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation”; substituted “$50” for “fifty” in subdivision F 2; and in subdivision F 3, substituted “cancellation thereof or renewal of a statement of partnership authority” for “or cancellation thereof,” and “$25” for “twenty-five dollars.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 316 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” near the end of subsection A and added subdivision F 4.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 inserted “except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

50-73.78

” in subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631, in subsection F, inserted the first and second sentences in the introductory paragraph; rewrote subdivisions F 2 and F 3 and deleted former subdivision F 4, which read: “The Commission shall have the authority to certify to the Comptroller directing refund of any overpayment of a fee, or of any fee collected for a document that is not accepted for filing, at any time within one year from the date of its payment.”; and added subsection K.

The 2007 amendment by c. 771 inserted subdivision F 4.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716, in subdivision F 1, inserted “filing”; in subdivisions F 1 a and F 1 b, substituted “A statement” for “For filing a statement”; deleted subdivision F 1 c, which read: “For restoration of status pursuant to subdivision E 1 of §

50-73.134

” and made related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675, in subsection C, deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person named as a partner in a statement shall personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.” and inserted the last sentence.`

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection C, deleted “except as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

50-73.78

” at the end of the first sentence; substituted “states the name of the partnership as it is set forth on the records of the Commission” for “names the partnership” in subdivision D 1; rewrote former subsections J and K as subdivisions J 1 and 2, respectively, and added subdivisions J 3 and 4. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 50-73.84.
Law governing internal relations.

Except as provided in subsection B, the law of the jurisdiction in which a partnership has its principal office governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The law of this Commonwealth shall govern relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership, and the liability of partners for debts, obligations and liabilities chargeable to the partnership, in a partnership that has filed a statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership in this Commonwealth.

Sections 9-406 and 9-408 of the Uniform Commercial Code, including §§

8.9A-406

and

8.9A-408

, do not apply to any interest in a partnership, including all rights, powers, and interests arising under the partnership agreement of a partnership, Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of this title, or this chapter. This provision prevails over §§

8.9A-406

and

8.9A-408

, and is expressly intended to permit the enforcement as a fundamental matter of contract among the partners of a partnership of any provision of a partnership agreement that would otherwise be ineffective under § 9-406 or § 9-408 of the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2003, c. 340; 2007, c. 631.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340 added subsection C.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 substituted “its principal” for “its chief executive” near the middle of subsection A.

§ 50-73.85.
Transactions between partner and partnership.

A partner may lend money to and transact other business with the partnership, and as to each loan or transaction, the rights and obligations of the partner are the same as those of a person who is not a partner, subject to other applicable law.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.86.
Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of chapter.

A partnership governed by this chapter is subject to any amendment to or repeal of this chapter.

History.

1996, c. 292.